District of Columbia statutes.
19-101.02

Homestead allowance.

A decedent’s surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is entitled to a homestead allowance of $15,000. If there is no surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner, each surviving minor child and each surviving dependent child of the decedent is entitled to a homestead allowance amounting to $15,000 divided by the number of surviving minor and surviving dependent children of the decedent. The homestead allowance is exempt from and has priority over all claims against the estate, except as provided in section 20-906 . The homestead allowance is in addition to any share passing to the surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, or surviving minor or surviving dependent child by the will of the decedent, unless otherwise provided by intestate succession, or by way of elective share.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(c), 48 DCR 2087
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-79, § 5(c), 53 DCR 1035
This section is referenced in § 19-1305.05 and § 20-906.
D.C. Law 16-79, substituted “surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner” for “surviving spouse” and substituted “surviving spouse, surviving domestic partner, or surviving minor” for “surviving spouse or surviving minor”.